Utah statutes.
58-71-305.   Exemptions from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following individuals may engage in the described acts or practices without being licensed under this chapter:

(1)  an individual rendering aid in an emergency, when no fee or other consideration of value for the service is charged, received, expected, or contemplated;

(2)  an individual administering a domestic or family remedy;

(3)  a person engaged in the sale of vitamins, health foods, dietary supplements, herbs, or other products of nature, the sale of which is not otherwise prohibited under state or federal law, but this subsection does not:

(a)  allow a person to diagnose any human disease, ailment, injury, infirmity, deformity, pain, or other condition; or

(b)  prohibit providing truthful and nonmisleading information regarding any of the products under this subsection;

(4)  a person engaged in good faith in the practice of the religious tenets of any church or religious belief, without the use of prescription drugs;

(5)  a person acting in good faith for religious reasons as a matter of conscience or based on a personal belief when obtaining or providing information regarding health care and the use of any product under Subsection (3);

(6)  an individual authorized by the Department of Health under Section 26-1-30, to draw blood pursuant to Subsection 41-6a-523(1)(a)(vi), 53-10-405(2)(a)(vi), or 72-10-502(5)(a)(vi);

(7)  a naturopathic medical assistant while working under the direct and immediate supervision of a licensed naturopathic physician to the extent the medical assistant is engaged in tasks appropriately delegated by the supervisor in accordance with the standards and ethics of the practice of naturopathic medicine; and

(8)  an individual who has completed all requirements for licensure under this chapter except the clinical experience required under Section 58-71-302, for a period of one year while that individual is completing that clinical experience requirement and who is working under the provisions of a temporary license issued by the division.



Amended by Chapter 267, 2012 General Session

